Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 10.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-610
Dogs in counties having a population of 80,000 inhabitants or more;
poundmaster; duties; filing complaint.

In counties having
a population of eighty thousand or more inhabitants and cities of the first
class contained in such counties, whenever complaints are made to the poundmaster
or the person or corporation performing the duties of poundmaster that a dog
is at large, it shall be the duty of such poundmaster, person, or corporation
to investigate such complaint. If upon such investigation it appears that
the complaint is founded upon facts, it shall be the duty of such poundmaster,
person, or corporation to take such dog into custody and he, she, or it may
file or cause to be filed a complaint in the county court against such person,
firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation owning, keeping,
or harboring such dog charging a violation of section 54-601 or 54-608.

Laws
1961, c. 268, § 4, p. 787;

Laws 1988, LB 630, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 801, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 338;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 10.